California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(B) For a period of four years upon the second occasion of any offense referred to in paragraph (2).

(C) Permanently, upon the third occasion of any offense referred to in subdivision (b) and paragraph (2).

(2) Paragraph (1) shall apply to any individual who is found by a federal or state court, or pursuant to a special administrative hearing
 meeting the requirements of regulations adopted by the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services, including any determination made on the basis of a plea of guilty or nolo contendere, to have submitted more than one application for the same type of aid for the same period of time, for the purpose of receiving more than one grant of aid in order to establish or maintain the family’s eligibility for aid or increasing, or preventing a reduction in, the amount of that aid.

(e) Proceedings against any individual alleged to have committed an offense described in subdivision (c) or (d) may be held either by hearing, pursuant to Section 10950 and in conformity with the regulations of the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services, if appropriate, or by referring the matter to the appropriate authorities for civil or criminal action in court.

(f) The department shall
 coordinate any action taken under this section with any corresponding actions being taken under CalFresh in any case where the factual issues involved arise from the same or related circumstances.

(g) Any period for which sanctions are imposed under this section shall remain in effect, without possibility of administrative stay, unless and until the findings upon which the sanctions were imposed are subsequently reversed by a court of appropriate jurisdiction, but in no event shall the duration of the period for which the sanctions are imposed be subject to review.

(h) Sanctions imposed under this section shall be in addition to, and not in substitution for, any other sanctions which may be provided for by law with respect to the offenses for which the sanctions are imposed.

(i) The department shall adopt regulations
 to ensure that any investigations made under this chapter are conducted throughout the state in such a manner as to protect the confidentiality of the current or former working recipient.

(j) Each county shall receive an amount equal to 12.5 percent of the actual amount of aid under this chapter repaid or recovered by a county, as determined by the Director of the Department of Finance resulting from the detection of fraud.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 227, Sec. 57.   (AB 1400)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

11486.3.

(a) The department, in consultation with system stakeholders, including county welfare departments, shall examine the CalWORKs sanction policy, its implementation, and effect on work participation, including but not limited to all of the following:

(1) The characteristics of the persons being sanctioned.

(2) The reason participants are being sanctioned.

(3) The length of time in sanctioned status.

(4) Positive and negative sanction outcomes.

(5) County variances in sanction policies, rates, and outcomes.

(6) The relationship between sanction rates and work participation.

(7) The impact of sanctions on families and their ability to become self-sufficient.

(8) Adequacy of procedures to resolve noncompliance prior to the implementation of sanctions.

(b) The department shall develop recommendations to improve the effectiveness of sanctions in achieving participant compliance, assisting families in becoming self-sufficient, and other desired program outcomes.

(c) The department shall report its findings and recommendations to the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the Legislature by April 1, 2005.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 229, Sec. 38.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

11486.5.

(a) An individual shall not be eligible for aid under this chapter if the individual is either:

(1) Fleeing to avoid prosecution, or custody and confinement after conviction, under the laws of the place from which the individual is fleeing, for a crime or an attempt to commit a crime that is a felony under the laws of the place from which the individual is fleeing, or which, in the case of the State of New Jersey, is a high misdemeanor under the laws of that state. For the purposes of this section, an individual shall be determined to be fleeing to avoid prosecution, or custody and confinement after conviction, if a federal, state, or local law enforcement officer, acting in an official capacity, presents an outstanding
 felony arrest warrant containing one or more of the following National Crime Information Center Offense Classification Codes: 

(A) Escape (4901).

(B) Flight to Avoid (4902).

(C) Flight-Escape (4999).

(2) Violating a condition of probation or parole imposed under federal law or the law of any state.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall not apply with respect to conduct of an individual for any month beginning after the President of the United States grants a pardon with respect to the conduct.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 260, Sec. 24.   (SB 345)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

11487.

(a) Whenever any aid under this chapter is repaid to the state by means of child support collections, the state shall be entitled to the amount received or recovered, except to the extent that county and federal funds were expended. If funds advanced by the federal government were paid, the federal government shall be entitled to a share of the amount received or recovered, proportionate to the amount of federal funds paid. Except as provided in subdivision (b), if funds were paid by a county, the county shall be entitled to a share of the amount received or recovered, proportionate to the amount of county funds paid.

(b) For the 2011–12 and 2012–13 fiscal years, the county
 share of funds received or recovered pursuant to subdivision (a) shall instead be suspended and these funds shall be retained by the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 47, Sec. 31.   (SB 1041)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

11487.1.

Except as provided in Sections 11457 and 11487, whenever any aid under this chapter is repaid to a county or recovered by a county, the state shall be entitled to a share of the amount received or recovered, proportionate to the amount of state funds paid, and, if funds advanced by the federal government were paid, the federal government shall be entitled to a share of the amount received or recovered, proportionate to the amount of federal funds paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 32, Sec. 58.   (AB 106)   Effective June 29, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

11487.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, including Sections 11487 and 15204.5, the department shall implement a program in any participating county whereby the county shall be reimbursed for overpayment recoveries under Section 11004 as follows:

(1) Reimbursement shall be made to a participating county based on a plan of operations for a program of overpayment recoveries that is approved by the department. No operating plan shall be approved by the department unless
 the plan contains assurances that the participating county will maintain a centralized unit or designate a person or persons to perform the overpayment recovery activities.

(2) Reimbursement shall be made for all allowable administrative costs incurred, as defined by the department, to make a recovery of overpayments under Section 11004, not to exceed the state’s share of the overpayments recovered by the county.

(b) For purposes of this section, “participating county” means any county in which the welfare director applies to the department for participation in the program prescribed by this section.

(c) This section shall be implemented when both of the following have occurred:

(1) The federal government has made funding available for the activities
 described in this section.

(2) The Department of Finance has examined the annual projection of costs and savings for these activities certified by the director, and has determined that during each fiscal year in which the director proposes to implement these provisions the savings to the General Fund from increased overpayment recoveries equals or exceeds the additional costs to the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 745, Sec. 246.   Effective October 12, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7.5. Family Violence Option:  Domestic Violence and Welfare [11495. - 11495.40.]

11495.

It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this article to maximize protections afforded to survivors of domestic violence, sexual harassment, sexual assault, and stalking through the provisions of this article. By adopting this provision, the Legislature recognizes that some individuals who may need public assistance have been or are victims of abuse, and intends to ensure that applicants and recipients who are past or present victims of abuse are not placed at further risk or unfairly penalized by CalWORKs requirements and procedures. The Legislature intends that, in implementing this article,
 program requirements not be created or applied in such a way as to encourage a victim to remain with the person committing the abuse.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 386, Sec. 1.   (AB 969)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

11495.1.

(a) The department shall align CalWORKs with, and not be more restrictive than, the federal family violence option pursuant to
 Section 402(a)(7)
 of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 602(a)(7)), and the requirements concerning survivors of abuse pursuant to Section 402(a)(8) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 602(a)(8)), and shall, to the fullest extent permitted, maximize protections afforded to survivors of abuse.

(b) On or before January 1, 2027, the department shall develop protocols on handling cases in which applicants and recipients are past or present victims of abuse. The protocols shall define domestic abuse, and shall address training standards and curricula, individual case assessments, confidentiality procedures, notice procedures and
 counseling or other appropriate participation requirements as part of an overall plan to transition from welfare-to-work. The protocol shall specify how counties shall do the following:

(1) Identify applicants and recipients of assistance under this chapter who have been or are victims of abuse, including those who self-identify, while protecting confidentiality.

(2) Refer these individuals to supportive services.

(3) Waive program requirements, on a case-by-case basis, for so long as necessary, in accordance with Section
 11495.15, as added by the act that added subdivision (e). Requirements that shall be waived, if eligible, include, but are not limited to, time limits on receipt of assistance, work requirements, educational requirements, paternity establishment and child support cooperation requirements.

(4) Issue an adequate written notice of action to each applicant or recipient of the determination about whether a waiver will be issued, and if a waiver is denied, the specific reasons for the denial.

(5) Issue timely and adequate notice of action when discontinuing a waiver that includes the specific
 reasons
 for termination.

(c) Waivers of time limits granted pursuant to this section shall not be implemented if federal statutes or regulations clarify that abuse victims are included in the 20-percent hardship exemptions and that no good cause waivers of the 20-percent limit will be granted to the state for victims of abuse, thereby incurring a penalty to the state.

(d) Waivers of the work requirements granted pursuant to this section shall not be implemented if federal statutes or regulations clarify that the state will be penalized for failing to meet work participation requirements due to granting waivers to abuse victims.

(e) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative
 Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement, interpret, or make specific the changes made to this section by the act that added this subdivision by means of all-county letters or similar written instructions from the department until regulations are adopted. These all-county letters or similar instructions shall have the same force and effect as regulations until the adoption of regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 386, Sec. 2.   (AB 969)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

11495.12.

For purposes of this article, until regulations are adopted pursuant to Section 11495.1, the term “abuse” means battering or subjecting a victim to extreme cruelty by (1) physical acts that resulted in or threatened to result in physical injury, (2) sexual abuse, (3) sexual activity involving a child in the home, (4) being forced to participate in nonconsensual sexual acts or activities, (5) threats of, or attempts at, physical or sexual abuse, (6) mental abuse, (7) neglect or deprivation of medical care, or (8) stalking.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 270, Sec. 155.   Effective August 11, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998, by Sec. 183 of Ch. 270.)
-------------------------------------------

11495.15.

(a) A county shall waive a program requirement for a recipient who has been identified as a past or present victim of abuse when it has been determined that good cause exists pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (f) of Section 11320.3. Until implementation of the regulations required pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 11495.1, a county may utilize standards, procedures, and protocols currently available and shall identify them in its county plan. Waivers shall be reevaluated in accordance with other routine periodic reevaluations by the county.

(b) This section
 shall be inoperative on January 1, 2028, or when the department notifies the Legislature that the Statewide Automated Welfare System can perform the necessary automation to implement Section 11495.15, as added by the act that added this subdivision, whichever date is later, and as of January 1 of the following year, is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 386, Sec. 3.   (AB 969)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Conditionally inoperative on or after January 1, 2028, as prescribed by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1 following the inoperative date.   See later operative version added by Sec. 4 of Stats. 2025, Ch. 386.)
-------------------------------------------

11495.15.

(a) (1) A county shall waive, on a case-by-case basis, a program requirement for an applicant or recipient who has been identified as a past or present victim of domestic abuse for good cause, as provided in this section.

(2) A county shall find good cause for a waiver under this article, and shall issue a waiver, when compliance with the program requirement would make it more difficult for an applicant or recipient, or their children, to escape abuse or to stay safe after escaping abuse, or that it would be detrimental or unfairly penalize those applicants or recipients who are or have been victimized by abuse or who are at risk of further
 domestic abuse.

(3) A county shall not deny a waiver absent
 a documented determination that an applicant or recipient could comply with the program requirement without that requirement making it more difficult for them, or their children, to escape abuse, or that the requirement would not be detrimental or unfairly penalize them. The recipient’s attestation regarding the impact of compliance with the program rule shall be sufficient to issue a waiver unless the county determines the statement is not credible because of the recipient’s contradictory statements or other supporting documentation.

(4) The department, in conjunction with counties, advocates, and current or former recipient survivors, shall develop statewide standards for determining when there is good cause to issue a waiver.

(b) When reviewing waiver
 eligibility, a county shall not consider participation hours in domestic violence, mental health, or substance disorder services that contribute to the individual meeting any required participation hours as a basis for denying a waiver. In no event shall a county deny a waiver because a survivor does not receive or participate in services from a victim service provider. A county shall not discontinue a waiver on the basis that a survivor chooses to voluntarily participate in welfare-to-work activities.

(c) A county shall reevaluate a waiver every six months. A county may reevaluate a waiver more frequently based upon the recipient’s report of changed circumstances.

(d) A county shall notify each applicant or recipient about whether a waiver will be issued, and if a waiver is
 denied, the specific reasons for the denial. The county shall provide an adequate written notice of action regarding the waiver request by the time of application approval. A county shall not take any adverse action against a recipient for noncompliance with a program requirement while a waiver request is pending for that program requirement.

(e) A county shall notify each recipient if a waiver will be terminated and the reasons for the termination. The county shall provide a written timely and adequate notice of action of the termination.

(f) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement, interpret,
 or make specific this section by means of all-county letters or similar written instructions from the department until regulations are adopted. These all-county letters or similar instructions shall have the same force and effect as regulations until the adoption of regulations.

(g) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2028, or when the department notifies the Legislature that the Statewide Automated Welfare System can perform the necessary automation to implement this section, whichever date is later.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 3) and added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 386, Sec. 4.   (AB 969)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Conditionally operative on or after January 1, 2028, as prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

11495.16.

(a) All CalWORKs applicants and recipients shall be informed verbally and in writing, and to the extent required by law, in the language understood by the applicant or recipient, of the availability of services designed to assist individuals to identify, escape, or stop future domestic abuse as well as to overcome the effects of domestic abuse.

(b) This section shall be inoperative on January 1, 2028, or when the department notifies the Legislature that the Statewide Automated Welfare System can perform the necessary automation to implement Section 11495.15, as added by
 the act that added this subdivision, whichever date is later, and as of January 1 of the following year, is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 386, Sec. 5.   (AB 969)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Conditionally inoperative on or after January 1, 2028, as prescribed by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1 following the inoperative date.   See later operative version added by Sec. 6 of Stats. 2025, Ch. 386.)
-------------------------------------------

11495.16.

(a) The department, in consultation with stakeholders, including, but not limited to, federally recognized state domestic violence and sexual assault coalitions, other domestic abuse, sexual assault, and sexual harassment advocates, and public benefits advocates, shall develop both of the following:

(1) A uniform set of written materials to be used statewide that addresses all relevant information and necessary requirements designed to assist individuals to identify, escape, or stop future abuse, overcome the effects of abuse, and make informed decisions. The statewide information may be provided in one document and shall include all of the following
 information:

(A) Available domestic abuse, stalking, sexual assault, and sexual harassment resources and victim service providers.

(B) How the information of an applicant or recipient abuse survivor is kept confidential and when the county human services agency is legally required to disclose that information.

(C) Information on the availability of program waivers, including a specific list of program requirements that may be waived, other program requirements not listed that may be waived,
 the option to waive other program requirements not listed, how to request a waiver, and a waiver request form, as described in paragraph (2).

(D) Information about safety planning, including the process of identifying risks, mapping out resources, and assessing options to increase survivor safety developed by specialized workers in partnership with the abuse survivor.

(E) How the county will tailor a recipient survivor’s welfare-to-work plan and CalWORKs support services to meet their needs.

(F) Information on CalWORKs eligibility for noncitizen abuse survivors, exceptions to immigrant sponsor deeming requirements, and information on applying for legal status for noncitizen abuse survivors.

(2) A standardized waiver request form that allows an applicant or recipient to identify the specific program requirements that they need waived. The form shall include a list of program requirements that may be waived, the ability to request a waiver of a requirement that may not be specifically listed, and a way for an applicant or recipient to indicate whether they are seeking a waiver for a retroactive period of time.

(b) A county shall safely and confidentially verbally inform of, and provide, in the preferred language identified by the applicant or recipient to the extent required by law, the written materials and standardized waiver request form described in subdivision (a) to each applicant and recipient. Each county shall supplement the written materials described in
 subdivision (a) with the name and contact information for local service providers, local policies, and local resources.

(c) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of all-county letters or similar written instructions from the department until regulations are adopted. These all-county letters or similar instructions shall have the same force and effect as regulations until the adoption of regulations.

(d) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2028, or when the department notifies the Legislature that the Statewide Automated Welfare
 System can perform the necessary automation to implement this section, whichever date is later.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 5) and added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 386, Sec. 6.   (AB 969)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Conditionally operative on or after January 1, 2028, as prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

11495.17.

During the annual budget process, the department shall update the Legislature at hearings regarding the number of CalWORKs recipients, aggregated by county, who have been identified as potential victims of domestic abuse during the online CalWORKs appraisal process, and the number of CalWORKs recipients who have been identified as survivors of nondomestic stalking, sexual abuse, and sexual harassment. The report shall also include a summary of actions taken by the department to address the specific and unique needs of survivors of abuse.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 386, Sec. 7.   (AB 969)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

11495.25.

Sworn statements by a victim of past or present abuse shall be sufficient to establish abuse unless the agency documents in writing an independent, reasonable basis to find the recipient not credible. Evidence may also include, but is not limited to: police, government agency, or court records or files; documentation from a domestic violence program, legal, clerical, medical or other professional from whom the applicant or recipient has sought assistance in dealing with abuse; or other evidence, such as a statement from any other individual with knowledge of the circumstances that provide the basis for the claim, physical evidence of abuse, or any other evidence that supports the statement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 703.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

11495.40.

The department shall adopt a model curriculum for domestic violence and sexual abuse prevention training, based on the statewide protocol, in consultation with the task force identified in Section 11495.1. County welfare agencies shall determine which staff will be trained.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 270, Sec. 155.   Effective August 11, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998, by Sec. 183 of Ch. 270.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Employment Retention Services [11500. - 11500.]

11500.

The county may continue to provide case management and services to either a recipient of aid under this chapter not participating under Article 3.2 (commencing with Section 11320) or a former recipient of aid under this chapter who has received aid within the previous 12 months if a recipient or former recipient is employed, in order to assist the individual in retaining employment. These job retention services may be provided for up to 12 months after the first day of employment, to the extent they are not provided by the employer, the entity that arranged the job placement, if other than the county, and, to the extent that the services are not available from other sources.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 270, Sec. 157.   Effective August 11, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998, by Sec. 183 of Ch. 270.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Evaluation of CalWORKs Program Implementation [11520. - 11523.7.]

11520.

The State Department of Social Services shall ensure that a comprehensive, independent statewide evaluation of the CalWORKs program is undertaken and that accurate evaluative information is made available to the Legislature in a timely fashion.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 270, Sec. 158.   Effective August 11, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998, by Sec. 183 of Ch. 270.)
-------------------------------------------

11520.3.

The department shall develop a research design to ensure a thorough evaluation of the direct and indirect effects of the CalWORKs program. Effects shall include, but not be limited to, employment, earnings, self-sufficiency, child care, child support, child well-being, family structure, and impacts on local government. Child well-being shall include entries into foster care, at-risk births, school achievement, child abuse reports, and rates of child poverty.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 270, Sec. 158.   Effective August 11, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998, by Sec. 183 of Ch. 270.)
-------------------------------------------

11520.5.

The statewide evaluation shall be conducted by an independent evaluator or evaluators. It shall represent a clear delineation of the research questions and shall, through discrete reports issued at regular intervals, provide information regarding process, impacts, and analyses of the costs and benefits of the CalWORKs program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 270, Sec. 158.   Effective August 11, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998, by Sec. 183 of Ch. 270.)
-------------------------------------------

11520.7.

The department shall ensure that county demonstration projects and other innovative county approaches to CalWORKs program implementation are independently and rigorously evaluated and that findings are reported to the Legislature in a timely fashion. The evaluation of a county-specific program shall be developed in conjunction with the county and other appropriate agencies responsible for the local program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 270, Sec. 158.   Effective August 11, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998, by Sec. 183 of Ch. 270.)
-------------------------------------------

11521.3.

Evaluation of CalWORKs program implementation conducted or commissioned by the department shall, to the extent practical, use or build upon existing welfare data archives, including, but not limited to, the data bases and research completed to date as part of the Work Pays Demonstration Project authorized pursuant to Chapter 97 of the Statutes of 1992.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 270, Sec. 158.   Effective August 11, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998, by Sec. 183 of Ch. 270.)
-------------------------------------------

11521.5.

The department shall have access and authority to obtain for tracking, monitoring, research and evaluation purposes to data collected by counties on recipients receiving cash aid, in-kind payments, or supportive services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 270, Sec. 158.   Effective August 11, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998, by Sec. 183 of Ch. 270.)
-------------------------------------------

11522.

The department, in conjunction with participating representatives of counties and the Legislature, shall develop approaches to improving data collection and management information reporting in the CalWORKs program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 78, Sec. 28.   Effective July 19, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

11523.

(a) This section shall be known and may be cited as the CalWORKs Outcomes and Accountability Review Act of 2017.

(b) The State Department of Social Services shall establish, by July 1, 2019, the California CalWORKs Outcomes and Accountability Review (Cal-OAR) to facilitate a local accountability system that fosters continuous quality improvement in county CalWORKs programs and in the collection and dissemination by the department of best practices in service delivery. The Cal-OAR shall cover CalWORKs services provided to current and former recipients, including those who are in sanction or exempt status or who are unengaged, and shall include the programmatic elements that each county offers as part of its CalWORKs service array as well as any local program
 components, and shall consist of performance indicators, a county CalWORKs self-assessment process, and a county CalWORKs system improvement plan. For purposes of this section, “CalWORKs services” shall include welfare-to-work, family stabilization, housing support, and post-employment job retention services.

(c) (1) (A) By October 1, 2017, the department shall convene a workgroup comprised of representatives from county human services agencies, legislative staff, interested welfare advocacy and research organizations, current and former CalWORKs recipients, organizations that represent county human services agencies and county boards of supervisors, representatives of community colleges, tribal organizations, and the workforce investment system, and any other state entities that the department deems necessary. The workgroup members shall also include individuals with expertise related to domestic
 violence, substance abuse, and mental health. The workgroup shall establish a workplan by which the Cal-OAR shall be conducted, pursuant to the provisions described in this section, including a process for qualitative peer reviews of counties’ CalWORKs services. The workgroup shall discuss potential costs for state and county participation.

(B) The department shall report annually to the Subcommittee on Health and Human Services of the Senate Committee on Budget and Fiscal Review and the Subcommittee on Health and Human Services of the Assembly Committee on Budget during the budget process with an update on the schedule for development of and future changes to the Cal-OAR.

(2) At a minimum, in establishing the work plan, the workgroup shall consider existing CalWORKs performance indicators being measured, additional, alternative, or additional and alternative process and outcome
 indicators to be measured, development of uniform elements of the county CalWORKs self-assessment and the county CalWORKs system improvement plans, timelines for implementation, recommendations for reducing the existing CalWORKS services data reporting burden in light of new requirements established by the act that added this section and the resulting Cal-OAR, recommendations for financial incentives to counties for achievement on performance measures, and an analysis of the county and state workload associated with implementation of the requirements of this section.

(d) The Cal-OAR shall consist of the following three components: performance indicators, a county CalWORKs self-assessment, and a county CalWORKs system improvement plan.

(1) (A) The Cal-OAR performance indicators shall be consistent with programmatic goals for the CalWORKs program, and shall
 include both process and outcome measures. These measures shall be established in order to provide baseline and ongoing information about how the state and counties are performing over time and to inform and guide each county human services agency’s CalWORKs self-assessment and CalWORKs system improvement plan.

(i) Process measures shall include measures of participant engagement, CalWORKs service delivery, and participation. Specific process measures shall be established by the department, in consultation with the workgroup, and may include measures of engagement as shown by improvement in program participation, timeliness of service provision, rates of utilization of program components, such as vocational education, and referrals and utilization of services based upon recommendations from the Online CalWORKs Appraisal Tool.

(ii) Outcome measures shall include measures of
 employment, educational attainment, program exits, and program reentries, and may include other indicators of family and child well-being as determined by the department, in consultation with the workgroup.

(B) Performance indicator data available in existing county data systems shall be collected by counties and provided to the department, and performance indicator data available in existing state department data systems shall be collected by the department and provided to the counties. These data shall be reported in a manner and on a schedule to be determined by the department, in consultation with the workgroup, but no less frequently than semiannually.

(C) (i) During the first five-year Cal-OAR cycle, performance indicator data, as reported by each county, shall be used to establish both county and statewide baselines for each of the process measures. After the first review cycle, the department shall, in consultation with the workgroup, establish standard target thresholds for each of the process measures established by the workgroup.

(ii) The department, in consultation with the workgroup, shall develop a process for resolving any disputes regarding the establishment of standard process thresholds pursuant to clause (i).

(D) For subsequent reviews, and based upon availability of additional data from enhancements to the Statewide Automated Welfare System or through interagency
 data-sharing agreements, the workgroup shall convene, as necessary, to consider whether to establish additional performance indicators that support the programmatic goals for the CalWORKs program. Any additional performance indicators established shall also be subject to the process described in subparagraph (C) and include consideration of when data on the additional performance indicators would be available for reporting, if not already available.

(E) If, during subsequent reviews, there is sufficient reason to establish statewide performance standards for one or more outcome measures, the department may, in consultation with the workgroup, establish those standards for each of the agreed-upon outcome measures. In making a determination as to whether there is sufficient reason to establish performance standards for any outcome measure, the department shall consider whether all counties could reasonably be expected to meet those standards
 given local variability in employment opportunities, availability of services, demographics, educational opportunities, and funding, among other things.

(2) (A) The county CalWORKs self-assessment component of the Cal-OAR, as established by the workgroup, shall require the county human services agencies to assess their performance on the established process and outcome measures that comprise the performance indicators, identify the strengths and weaknesses in their current practice and resource deployment, identify and describe how local operational decisions and systemic factors affect program outcomes, and consider areas of focus that may be included in the county CalWORKs system improvement plan, as described in paragraph (3). The county CalWORKs self-assessment process shall be designed to identify areas of best practices for replication and for system improvement at the county level, and shall guide the development of the county CalWORKs system improvement plan, as described in paragraph (3). To the extent a county identifies eligibility procedures and practices that it determines, through its self-assessment, contribute to its achievement on process and outcome measures related to CalWORKs services, the county may, at its option, incorporate eligibility-related elements into its system improvement plan.

(B) (i) The county CalWORKs self-assessment process shall be completed every five years by the county in consultation and collaboration with local stakeholders and submitted to the department.

(ii) Local stakeholders shall include county CalWORKs administrators, supervisors, and caseworkers; current and former CalWORKs recipients; and county human services agency partners. To the extent possible and relevant, local stakeholders shall also include representatives of community colleges, tribal organizations, and the local workforce board. Additional specific county human services agency partners shall be determined by the county and may include, but are not limited to, adult education providers, providers of services for survivors of domestic violence, the local housing continuum of care, county behavioral health departments, county drug and alcohol
 programs, community-based service providers, organizations that represent CalWORKs recipients, child care resource and referral programs, and alternative payment programs, as appropriate.

(3) (A) (i) The county CalWORKs system improvement plan shall consist of uniform elements to be developed by the workgroup. It shall, at a minimum, describe how the county will improve its CalWORKs program performance in strategic focus areas based upon information learned through the county CalWORKs self-assessment process. The county CalWORKs system improvement plan shall be approved in public session by the county’s board of supervisors or, as applicable, chief elected official, and submitted to the department.

(ii) The county CalWORKs system improvement plan shall be completed every five years by the county, approved in public session by the county’s board of supervisors or, as applicable, chief elected official, and be submitted to the department.
